Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Neighborhood partnership grants. new text end new text begin (a) For neighborhood partnership grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.99: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,600,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,600,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of the amounts in paragraph (a), $1,300,000 each year is for the Northside Achievement Zone and $1,300,000 each year is for the St. Paul Promise Neighborhood. new text end new text begin (c) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $2,600,000. For purposes of the base for fiscal year 2028 and later, the allocations under paragraph (b) continue. new text end new text begin (d) Any balance in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Regional neighborhood partnership grants. new text end new text begin (a) For regional neighborhood partnership grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.99: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,400,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,400,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of the amounts in paragraph (a), $200,000 each year is for the following programs: new text end new text begin (1) Northfield Healthy Community Initiative in Northfield; new text end new text begin (2) Red Wing Youth Outreach Program in Red Wing; new text end new text begin (3) United Way of Central Minnesota in St. Cloud; new text end new text begin (4) Austin Aspires in Austin; new text end new text begin (5) Rochester Area Foundation in Rochester; new text end new text begin (6) Greater Twin Cities United Way for Generation Next; and new text end new text begin (7) Children First and Partnership for Success in St. Louis Park. new text end new text begin (c) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $1,400,000. For purposes of the base for fiscal year 2028 and later, the allocations under paragraph (b) continue. new text end new text begin (d) Any balance in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Regional neighborhood partnership onetime grants. new text end new text begin (a) For onetime grants for regional neighborhood partnership: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin $900,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin $900,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of the amounts in paragraph (a), $100,000 each year is for the following programs: new text end new text begin (1) Northfield Healthy Community Initiative in Northfield; new text end new text begin (2) Red Wing Youth Outreach Program in Red Wing; new text end new text begin (3) United Way of Central Minnesota in St. Cloud; new text end new text begin (4) Austin Aspires in Austin; new text end new text begin (5) Rochester Area Foundation in Rochester; new text end new text begin (6) Greater Twin Cities United Way for Generation Next; new text end new text begin (7) Children First and Partnership for Success in St. Louis Park; new text end new text begin (8) Northside Achievement Zone; and new text end new text begin (9) St. Paul Promise Neighborhood. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Emerging partnership grant. new text end new text begin (a) For emerging neighborhood partnership grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.99: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Grant money may be used for initial planning and development of education partnership program locations, including but not limited to organizational and planning functions to identify partners, community supports, and services. The commissioner of education must review proposals and award grants to programs that primarily serve historically underserved students. To the extent practicable, the commissioner must award grants equitably among the geographic areas of Minnesota, including rural, suburban, and urban communities. The submitted proposal for an emerging partnership grant must include evidence of: (1) readiness to pursue the activities required of an established partnership; and (2) adding geographic or demographic diversity to the education partnerships network. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end